Utah statutes.
35A-1-207.   State workforce services plan -- Economic service area plans.

(1)  The State Council on Workforce Services shall annually develop a state workforce services plan that shall include:

(a)  a mechanism for getting consumer and public feedback on department programs in each economic service area;

(b)  projected analysis of the workforce needs of employers and clients;

(c)  policy standards in programs and process when required by statute or considered necessary by the council that ensure statewide program consistency among economic service areas;

(d)  state outcome-based standards for measuring program performance to ensure equitable service to all clients;

(e)  state oversight systems to review economic service area compliance with state policies;

(f)  elements of economic service area plans that relate to statewide initiatives and programs;

(g)  strategies to ensure program responsiveness, universal access, unified case management;

(h)  strategies to eliminate unnecessary barriers to access services; and

(i)  strategies to provide assistance to employees facing employment dislocation and their employers.

(2) (a)  Economic service area directors shall annually develop an economic service area plan to be followed in administering services.

(b)  The plan shall include:

(i)  a projected analysis of the economic service area workforce needs of employers and clients;

(ii)  assurances that state policy standards will be incorporated into the economic service area design;

(iii)  an economic service area budget outlining administration and customer support and services expenditures;

(iv)  the location of employment centers and staff levels to deliver services;

(v)  the services to be provided including assessment and support services, job training options, job placement, and employer outreach;

(vi)  identification of targeted occupations for which training will be approved;

(vii)  economic service area outcome-based performance standards that ensure equitable services to all clients;

(viii)  economic service area oversight processes that include a process to evaluate program effectiveness and develop plans to improve programs;

(ix)  internal and external marketing strategies to improve the understanding and visibility of economic service area efforts;

(x)  coordination of apprenticeship training; and

(xi)  strategies to provide assistance to employees facing employment dislocation and their employers.



Amended by Chapter 188, 2011 General Session

